prince/dictionaries/bg.aff
SFX X Y 148
SFX X   а         ал        а
SFX X   а         ала       а
SFX X   а         алата     а
SFX X   а         али       а
SFX X   а         алите     а
SFX X   а         алия      а
SFX X   а         алият     а
SFX X   а         ало       а
SFX X   а         алото     а
SFX X   а         ан        а
SFX X   а         ана       а
SFX X   а         аната     а
SFX X   а         ани       а
SFX X   а         аните     а
SFX X   а         ания      а
SFX X   а         аният     а
SFX X   а         ано       а
SFX X   а         аното     а
SFX X   а         ат        а
SFX X   а         ах        а
SFX X   а         аха       а
SFX X   а         ахме      а
SFX X   а         ахте      а
SFX X   а         е         а
SFX X   а         ейки      а
SFX X   а         ели       а
SFX X   а         елите     а
SFX X   а         ем        а
SFX X   а         ете       а
SFX X   а         еш        а
SFX X   а         еше       а
SFX X   а         ещи       а
SFX X   а         ещите     а
SFX X   а         и         а
SFX X   а         ял        а
SFX X   а         яла       а
SFX X   а         ялата     а
SFX X   а         ялия      а
SFX X   а         ялият     а
SFX X   а         яло       а
SFX X   а         ялото     а
SFX X   а         ях        а
SFX X   а         яха       а
SFX X   а         яхме      а
SFX X   а         яхте      а
SFX X   а         ящ        а
SFX X   а         яща       а
SFX X   а         ящата     а
SFX X   а         ящия      а
SFX X   а         ящият     а
SFX X   а         ящо       а
SFX X   а         ящото     а
SFX X   м         дат       м
SFX X   м         де        м
SFX X   м         дели      м
SFX X   м         делите    м
SFX X   м         дем       м
SFX X   м         ден       м
SFX X   м         дена      м
SFX X   м         дената    м
SFX X   м         дени      м
SFX X   м         дените    м
SFX X   м         дения     м
SFX X   м         деният    м
SFX X   м         дено      м
SFX X   м         деното    м
SFX X   м         дете      м
SFX X   м         деш       м
SFX X   м         деше      м
SFX X   м         дох       м
SFX X   м         доха      м
SFX X   м         дохме     м
SFX X   м         дохте     м
SFX X   м         дял       м
SFX X   м         дяла      м
SFX X   м         дялата    м
SFX X   м         дялия     м
SFX X   м         дялият    м
SFX X   м         дяло      м
SFX X   м         дялото    м
SFX X   м         дях       м
SFX X   м         дяха      м
SFX X   м         дяхме     м
SFX X   м         дяхте     м
SFX X   м         й         м
SFX X   м         йте       м
SFX X   м         л         м
SFX X   м         ла        м
SFX X   м         лата      м
SFX X   м         ли        м
SFX X   м         лите      м
SFX X   м         лия       м
SFX X   м         лият      м
SFX X   м         ло        м
SFX X   м         лото      м
SFX X   я         а         я
SFX X   я         ал        я
SFX X   я         ала       я
SFX X   я         алата     я
SFX X   я         али       я
SFX X   я         алите     я
SFX X   я         алия      я
SFX X   я         алият     я
SFX X   я         ало       я
SFX X   я         алото     я
SFX X   я         ан        я
SFX X   я         ана       я
SFX X   я         аната     я
SFX X   я         ани       я
SFX X   я         аните     я
SFX X   я         ания      я
SFX X   я         аният     я
SFX X   я         ано       я
SFX X   я         аното     я
SFX X   я         ах        я
SFX X   я         аха       я
SFX X   я         ахме      я
SFX X   я         ахте      я
SFX X   я         е         я
SFX X   я         ейки      я
SFX X   я         ел        я
SFX X   я         ела       я
SFX X   я         елата     я
SFX X   я         ели       я
SFX X   я         елите     я
SFX X   я         елия      я
SFX X   я         елият     я
SFX X   я         ело       я
SFX X   я         елото     я
SFX X   я         ем        я
SFX X   я         ете       я
SFX X   я         ех        я
SFX X   я         еха       я
SFX X   я         ехме      я
SFX X   я         ехте      я
SFX X   я         еш        я
SFX X   я         еше       я
SFX X   я         ещ        я
SFX X   я         еща       я
SFX X   я         ещата     я
SFX X   я         ещи       я
SFX X   я         ещите     я
SFX X   я         ещия      я
SFX X   я         ещият     я
SFX X   я         ещо       я
SFX X   я         ещото     я
SFX X   я         и         я
SFX X   я         ят        я
